Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,110
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; funding.

It is the intent of the Legislature to use the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund established in section 68-996 to fund the services provided under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 7.